Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-910
Director; employees; inquiries to determine fitness for duties; investigation and report to Governor.

The Director of Correctional Services may examine any employee of the Department of Correctional Services and make such inquiries as will determine the employee's fitness for his or her respective duties, and the director shall investigate and report to the Governor any abuses or wrongs alleged to exist in the department.

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 62;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 67.